Hawaii statutes.
[§454M-7] License sanctions;
suspension, revocation, denial, condition, and refusal to renew, reinstate, or
restore. In addition to any other actions authorized by law, the
commissioner may suspend, revoke, deny, condition in any manner, or refuse to
renew, reinstate, or restore, any license issued under this chapter, or fine
any person holding a license issued under this chapter, for any violation of
this chapter. All such orders shall be made pursuant to chapter 91. [L 2009, c
106, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next